District of Columbia statutes.
47-1602

Repealed

Storage of distrained property; manner of sale.

Repealed.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 621, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 12(b)
Apr. 28, 1904, 33 Stat. 564, ch. 1815
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 19(b), 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1602.
1973 Ed., § 47-1302.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”